Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB307.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 301 of the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 301. Adoption by regulations.* * *(c.1) Access aisles.--(1) The department shall promulgate regulations requiring that each addition of a new access aisle on or after the effective date of this subsection be a width of 96 inches.(2) The department shall promulgate regulations 12345678910111213141516171819 requiring that each existing access aisle on the effective date of this subsection that is less than 96 inches be altered to 96 inches when the parking lot is relined during typical maintenance schedules after the effective date of this subsection.(3) As used in this subsection, the term "access aisle" means a physical area marked adjacent to a parking space reserved for an individual with a disability that is:(i) Designated by white or blue pavement marking hash marks, cross-hatching or other similar visual no-parking indicators.(ii) Reserved to provide additional space for an individual using a wheelchair, wheelchair lift or other mobility device.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0307PN0260 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516